Florida, session 2026, SB464.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âParagraph (g) of subsection (4) of section 10 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 11 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 12 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 13 powers and perform all duties listed below: 14 (4)âESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION, AND OPERATION OF SCHOOLS. 15 Adopt and provide for the execution of plans for the 16 establishment, organization, and operation of the schools of the 17 district, including, but not limited to, the following: 18 (g)âObservance of school holidays and vacation periods. 19 Designate the observance of school holidays and vacation 20 periods. Each school district shall observe Veteransâ Day, as 21 listed in s. 110.117(1)(f), as a school holiday. 22 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.